California statutes. Education Code
 Colleges on or before January 1, 2015, who shall publish all executive summaries, sending copies to the appropriate policy and budget committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, every community college and community college district, each consultation group identified in subdivision (b) that so requests, and additional individuals and organizations as deemed appropriate.

(d) The plan shall be updated every three academic years and plan updates shall be submitted to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges for publication and distribution as provided for in subdivision (c).

(e) (1) Funding included in the Budget Act for the Student Equity and Achievement Program may be used for the provision of emergency student financial
 assistance to help an eligible student overcome unforeseen financial challenges that would directly impact the student’s ability to persist in the student’s course of study. These challenges include, but are not limited to, the immediate need for shelter or food. Each community college district and campus is encouraged to consider the unique characteristics of its student body in developing specific guidelines for further defining what constitutes an unforeseen financial challenge for its students.

(2) In order for emergency student financial assistance to be an allowable use of Student Equity and Achievement Program funds, emergency student financial assistance shall be included in the institution’s plan for interventions to students.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the following
 terms are defined as follows:

(A) “Eligible student” means a student who has experienced an unforeseen financial challenge, who is making satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the college the student attends, and who is at risk of not persisting in the student’s course of study due to the unforeseen financial challenge. For purposes of this paragraph, the definition of satisfactory academic progress used by the community college shall provide that homelessness, as defined as a “homeless individual” within the meaning of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11302(a)), or as defined as a “homeless child or youth,” as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), is an extenuating circumstance for students who are otherwise unable to meet the requirements deemed to constitute “satisfactory academic progress” at that community college,
 and that extenuating circumstance may be considered by the institution to alter or excuse compliance with those progress requirements.

(B) “Emergency student financial assistance” means financial support to assist a student to overcome unforeseen financial challenges, including, but not limited to, direct aid in the form of emergency grants, housing and food assistance, textbook grants, and transportation assistance, so that the student can continue the student’s course of study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.   (AB 2403)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

78221.

The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate funds provided for purposes of successfully implementing the activities and goals specified in the student equity plans adopted pursuant to Section 78220, consistent with all of the following:

(a) The chancellor shall ensure a community college district has submitted a student equity plan that is consistent with Section 78220. For purposes of allocating funding appropriated in the 2014–15 Budget Act, a community college district that has not submitted a student equity plan shall provide the chancellor with an outline for the community college district’s completion of the student equity plan on or before January 1, 2015.

(b) The chancellor shall ensure
 that community college districts that serve greater populations of students who are high-need students or disadvantaged students receive greater resources to provide services to students, consistent with the goals and activities specified in their student equity plans.

(c) The chancellor shall establish criteria for calculating the number of high-need and disadvantaged students in a community college district. For purposes of this article, “high-need students” mean students who have an expected family contribution, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 69432.7, at any time during those students’ matriculation at the institution, that would qualify those students to receive federal Pell Grants and students from ZIP Codes in the bottom two quintiles of college attainment. The calculation of a student’s expected family contribution shall be based on the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) application or an application determined by
 the California Student Aid Commission to be equivalent to the FAFSA application submitted by that student. For purposes of this article, the determination of who are “disadvantaged” students shall take into account the college participation rate of the college-aged population of, and the socioeconomic status of, a community college district population.

(d) The chancellor shall establish a standard methodology, including guidelines, for measurement of student equity and disproportionate impact for disaggregated subgroups of the student population of the California Community Colleges. The chancellor shall establish the methodology for use in the student equity plans of community college districts.

(e) (1) The chancellor shall, consistent with the goal of eliminating any achievement disparities that are identified pursuant to the requirements of Section 78220,
 provide guidance to community college districts regarding expenditures and activities to ensure that funding is used to support evidence-based practices to implement student equity plan goals and coordinate services for the targeted student populations through evidence-based practices.

(2) (A) On or before March 15, 2016, and, except as provided in subparagraph (B), March 15 annually thereafter, the chancellor shall submit a report to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, on the expenditure of funds for purposes of this article during the previous fiscal year.

(B) Beginning in the 2025–26 fiscal year, the chancellor may submit the report described in
 subparagraph (A) annually, on or before March 1, to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 23.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

78221.5.

As a condition for receiving funding pursuant to the Student Equity and Achievement Program established by Section 78222, a community college shall do all of the following: 

(a) (1) Inform students of their rights to access transfer-level coursework and academic credit English as a second language (ESL) coursework, and of the multiple measures placement policies developed by the
 community college, as provided in Section 78213.

(2) The information described in paragraph (1) shall be communicated in language that is easily understandable, and shall be prominently featured in the community college catalog, orientation materials, information relating to student assessment on the community college’s Internet Web site, and any written communication by a college counselor to a student about the student’s course placement options.

(b) Annually report both of the following to the chancellor’s
 office in a manner and form prescribed by the chancellor’s office, consistent with the requirements of Section 78213:

(1) The community college’s placement policies.

(2) (A) The community college’s placement results. A community college shall include the number of students assessed and the number of
 students placed into transfer-level
 coursework, transfer-level coursework with concurrent support, or transfer-level or credit ESL coursework, disaggregated by race and ethnicity.

(B) For students placed in stand-alone English or mathematics
 pretransfer-level coursework, a community college district or college shall
 provide, based on local placement research, an explanation of how effective practices align with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 78213.

(c) Publicly post its placement results, including the number of students assessed and the
 number of students placed into transfer-level
 coursework, transfer-level coursework with concurrent support, or transfer-level or credit ESL coursework, disaggregated by race and ethnicity.

(d) Satisfy the requirements of this section by the implementation date, established by regulation pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 78213, for purposes of compliance with the requirements of Section 78213.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the chancellor’s office
 shall make data collected pursuant to subdivision (b) publicly available, except for personally identifiable information, which shall be deemed confidential, by posting the data on the Internet Web site of the chancellor’s office or making it publicly available upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

78222.

(a) (1) The Student Equity and Achievement Program is hereby established.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds for the Student Equity and Achievement Program support the California Community Colleges in advancing the systemwide goal to boost achievement for all students with an emphasis on eliminating achievement gaps for students from traditionally underrepresented groups by doing all of the following:

(A) Implementing activities and practices pursuant to the California Community College Guided Pathways Grant Program.

(B) Ensuring students complete their educational goals and a defined course of
 study.

(C) Providing quality curriculum, instruction, and support services to students who enter college deficient in English and mathematics to ensure these students complete a course of study in a timely manner.

(b) As a condition of the receipt of funds for purposes of this section, a district shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Maintain a student equity plan pursuant to Section 78220 to ensure equal educational opportunities and to promote student success for all students, regardless of race, gender, age, disability, or economic circumstances.

(2) Provide student matriculation services pursuant to Section 78212, including implementation of orientation, counseling and advising, referral to specialized student support services, and other
 education planning services needed to assist a student in making informed decisions about the student’s educational goal and course of study and in developing an education plan. The
 office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall establish guidelines on student matriculation services, including, but not limited to, the development of an education plan leading to a course of study. Notwithstanding any other law, students who are exempted from matriculation services pursuant to Section 78215 are not subject to the requirements of this paragraph.

(3) Adopt and implement placement and enrollment policies consistent with the requirements of Section 78213.

(4) Provide all students with an education plan that identifies courses, a sequence of courses, key progress milestones, and other requirements the student must complete to earn an associate degree, career technical education certificate, other community college certificate, or meet transfer requirements. Notwithstanding any other law, students who
 are exempted from having an education plan under Section 78215 are not subject to the requirement of this paragraph.

(5) Provide support to, or establish, on-campus food pantries or regular food distributions.

(6) Provide a report to the chancellor’s office by January 1 of each year detailing how funding pursuant to this section was expended in the prior fiscal year and for what specific purposes. A district report shall also include an assessment of the progress in advancing the goals identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) If the total amount of funds appropriated for purposes of this section is equal to or greater than the amount of funds appropriated in the 2017–18 fiscal year for the Student Success and Support Program pursuant to Section 78212, the student equity plans
 pursuant to Section 78221, and the Student Success for Basic Skills program pursuant to Section 88815, the chancellor shall allocate to each district an amount equal to or greater than the amount allocated in the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(2) If the total amount of funds appropriated for purposes of this section is less than the amount of funds appropriated in the 2017–18 fiscal year for the Student Success and Support Program pursuant to Section 78212, the student equity plans pursuant to Section 78221, and the Student Success for Basic Skills program pursuant to Section 88815, the chancellor shall allocate to each district the pro rata share of the amount appropriated based on the amount allocated to each district in the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(3) The
 board of governors may require districts or colleges to provide a local fund match for funding appropriated for purposes of this section.

(4) The chancellor shall provide guidance to districts regarding eligible expenditures and activities and integrated planning to ensure funding for the Student Equity and Achievement Program is used to support the goal of eliminating disparities pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). It is the intent of the Legislature that colleges prioritize funding for high-need and disadvantaged students, as those terms are defined in subdivision (c) of Section 78221.

(5) (A) The chancellor may allocate up to 5 percent of the total funds appropriated for the purposes of this program for state administrative operations to carry out the intent of this section.

(B) Of the amount allocated pursuant to subparagraph (A), the chancellor shall allocate to a community college district no less than the amount that was provided to a district in the 2017–18 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 88815 to carry out faculty and staff development to improve curriculum, instruction, student services, and program practices in the areas of foundational skills and English as a second language program.

(6) (A) By April 1 of each year,
 except as provided in subparagraph (B), the chancellor’s office shall submit a systemwide report to the Legislature and Department of Finance that provides a summary of the district reports referenced in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b).

(B) Beginning in the 2025–26 fiscal year, the chancellor’s office shall submit the report described in subparagraph (A) annually, on or before March 1, to the Legislature and Department of Finance.

 (C) A report to the Legislature
 pursuant to this paragraph shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) (1) All districts receiving an allocation of funds pursuant to subdivision (c) shall comply with the requirements of Section 78214. In meeting this requirement, the Student Success and Support Program referenced in Section 78214 means the Student Equity and Achievement Program.

(2) For purposes of Section 87482.3, the Student Success and Support Program means the Student Equity and Achievement Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 24.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Athletic Programs [78223. - 78223.]

78223.

The governing board of a community college district may enforce rules and regulations relating to eligibility for and participation in intercollegiate athletics. The rules and regulations may include, but are not limited to, those adopted by a voluntary association, one of whose purposes is to govern intercollegiate athletics among schools and colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 160.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Work-Experience Education [78249. - 78249.]

78249.

(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of this code or the Labor Code to the contrary, the community college district under whose supervision work-experience education, or occupational training classes held in the community, as defined by regulations adopted by the board of governors, are provided shall be considered the employer under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code of persons receiving the training unless the persons during the training are being paid a cash wage or salary by a private employer, or unless the person or firm under whom those persons are receiving work experience or occupational training elects to provide workers’ compensation insurance. An apprentice, while attending related and supplemental instruction classes, shall be considered to be in the employ of the apprentice’s employer and not subject to this section, unless the apprentice is unemployed. Whenever the work-experience education, or occupational training classes held in the community, are under the supervision of a regional occupational center or program operated by two or more community college districts pursuant to Section 52301, the district of residence of the persons receiving the training shall be deemed the employer for the purposes of this section.

(b) Sections 1292, 1293, and 1294 of the Labor Code shall not apply to work-experience education programs established pursuant to this article if the work-experience coordinator determines that the students have been sufficiently trained in the employment or work otherwise prohibited, if parental approval is obtained, and the principal or the counselor of the student has determined that the progress of the student toward graduation will not be impaired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 477.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.51. Nursing Faculty [78260. - 78260.]

78260.

(a) (1) In order to further the state’s interests in a major expansion in the number of educated nurses in California, the Legislature finds that it is necessary to ensure a significant expansion in the number of qualified nursing faculty at California Community Colleges. Therefore, the Legislature hereby creates the California Community Colleges Nursing Faculty Recruitment and Retention Program in the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges for purposes of facilitating the recruitment and retention of qualified nursing faculty. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate funds on a competitive grant basis to community college districts that commit to sustained increases in the number of full-time equivalent students taught in the district’s nursing programs, as specified by the chancellor, and that also commit to the terms and conditions specified in this section.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the grants awarded under this article should be one-time grants and that the total amount of the funding for this article in any fiscal year should be limited to the amount appropriated for that purpose in the annual Budget Act. The Legislature finds and declares that the initial funding for this article is the appropriation contained in paragraph (30) of subdivision (a) of Section 43 of Chapter 79 of the Statutes of 2006.

(b) (1) (A) The grant amount to each participating district shall be based on the number of full-time faculty at the district who are in their first through fifth year of service as an instructor in a California Community College registered nursing program in the fiscal year for which funds are disbursed. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a community college district that receives an allocation for the making of grants under this article shall have up to five years to disburse these funds.

(B) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the amount granted to any person under this article shall not exceed a total of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) disbursed over a five-year period with a maximum of six thousand dollars ($6,000) in any one year.

(2) Disbursements under this section shall be based on the following schedule:

(A) Six thousand dollars ($6,000) for each instructor in his or her first year.

(B) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each instructor in his or her second year.

(C) Four thousand dollars ($4,000) for each instructor in his or her third year.

(D) Three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each instructor in his or her fourth year.

(E) Two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each instructor in his or her fifth year.

(3) Notwithstanding the amounts listed in paragraph (2), the amount granted to a person under this article may be supplemented, in any year of the five-year cycle of disbursements under paragraph (2), by up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) in local matching funds, plus an equal amount of funds disbursed pursuant to this program.

(4) A person who receives a grant under this article shall not be eligible for participation in the State Nursing Assumption Program of Loans for Education Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 70100) of Part 42.

(c) Each district is authorized, through its shared governance and collective bargaining relationships, to allocate actual payments to faculty in their first through fifth years of service as a nursing instructor on a different basis if the district finds that its ability to recruit and retain nursing faculty is thereby enhanced.

(d) Each district may use a portion of the grant proceeds to offer incentives to either full-time or part-time nursing instructors for the purpose of instruction in clinical settings during weekends and evenings. This subdivision shall not construed to be limited to faculty in their first through fifth years of service as nursing instructors.

(e) As a condition of receiving grant funds under this article, each district agrees to provide the chancellor with all data requested by the chancellor on the expenditure of funds and program outcomes.

(f) The chancellor shall report annually by March 1 to the Legislature and the Governor on program expenditures and outcomes by participating district and college.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 837, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.52. Nursing Students [78261. - 78261.5.]

78261.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) The Legislature intends to facilitate both the expansion of associate degree nursing programs and the improvement in completion rates in those programs.

(2) The Legislature also intends that community colleges employ nationally recognized diagnostic assessment tools that are aligned with national nursing licensure requirements. Both students and the state benefit when diagnostic assessments are supplemented with educational opportunities to assist students in meeting skill levels.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to create a Nursing Enrollment Growth and
 Retention program in the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. The purpose of this program shall be to provide grants to community college associate degree of nursing programs that meet either of the following conditions:

(1) The nursing program has low or moderate program attrition levels.

(2) The nursing program provides a comprehensive program of diagnostic assessment, prenursing preparation, and program-based support to students.

(c) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that this program shall be funded, beginning in the 2006–07 fiscal year, by a redirection of the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) provided annually pursuant to the Budget Act of 2005, along with an additional investment of two million eight hundred eighty-six thousand dollars ($2,886,000)
 annually, for a total program budget of twelve million eight hundred eighty-six thousand dollars ($12,886,000) annually. Unencumbered funds that were appropriated in the Budget Act of 2005 may be used for capacity building and equipment in the 2006–07 fiscal year.

(2) Up to 3 percent of the funds appropriated for this program may be used for statewide administration, program development, program evaluation, and program accountability. As used in this paragraph, “program development” includes, but is not limited to, activities related to partnerships or collaborations between community colleges and institutions of higher education offering baccalaureate degrees in order to increase the number of students completing bachelor of the science of nursing (BSN), master of the science of nursing (MSN), and master’s entry programs in nursing (MEPN) courses of study.

(d) The Board of
 Governors of the California Community Colleges may award grants to community college districts with associate degree nursing programs to expand enrollment, reduce program attrition, or both. Funds shall be used only for purposes of expanding enrollment, providing diagnostic assessments, and offering preentry coursework to prospective nursing students and diagnostic assessments and supportive services to enrolled nursing students. For purposes of this section, supportive services include, but are not limited to, tutoring, case management, mentoring, and counseling services. Funds may also be used to develop alternative delivery models such as part-time, evening, weekend, and summer program offerings. In order to qualify for these funds, a community college associate degree nursing program shall do either of the following:

(1) Have a program attrition rate, as determined by the Board of Registered Nursing’s Annual School Report or the Information
 Program Data System of the chancellor’s office, of 15 percent or less for the year before applying for funding.

(2) Commit to implement a comprehensive program of diagnostic assessment, prenursing enrollment preparation, and program-based support to enrolled students, as defined in this article.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 78213 or any other law, before awarding any funds to be used for reducing program attrition, the chancellor’s office shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify, in collaboration with community college associate degree nursing programs, nationally recognized diagnostic assessment tools that
 determine the likelihood of academic success in community college registered nursing education programs.

(2) Establish, in collaboration with community college associate degree nursing programs, the systemwide proficiency level necessary for academic success for each diagnostic assessment tool.

(3) Define the kinds of educational and support services that qualify for funding under this program.

(f) As a condition of receiving grants under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), a community college district shall, at minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Use diagnostic assessment tools before enrollment to determine readiness for community college associate degree nursing
 programs.

(2) Offer, or identify, educational preentry coursework, including, but not limited to, tutorials, instructional resources, or noncredit instruction, aligned to the entry level nursing standards and curriculum for students who fail to demonstrate readiness based upon the diagnostic assessment tools.

(3) Provide access to prenursing coursework for all students who do not demonstrate readiness based upon the diagnostic assessment tools.

(4) Require that students demonstrate readiness through the diagnostic assessment or successful completion of the prenursing coursework specified above before commencing the registered nursing program.

(5) Ensure that students that participate in educational preentry coursework in order to demonstrate readiness
 based upon the diagnostic assessment tools are not disadvantaged in the program enrollment process.

(g) As a condition of receiving grant funds pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), each recipient community college district shall report to the chancellor’s office the following data for the academic year on or before a date determined by the chancellor’s office:

(1) The number of students enrolled in the nursing program.

(2) The number of students taking diagnostic assessments.

(3) The number of students failing to meet proficiency levels as determined by diagnostic assessment tools.

(4) The number of students failing to meet proficiency levels that undertake preentry preparation
 classes.

(5) The number of students who successfully complete preentry preparation coursework.

(6) The average number of months between initial diagnostic assessment, demonstration of readiness, and enrollment in the nursing program for students failing to meet proficiency standards on the initial diagnostic assessment.

(7) The average number of months between diagnostic assessment and program enrollment for students meeting proficiency standards on the initial diagnostic assessment.

(8) The number of students who completed the associate degree nursing program and the number of students who pass the National Council Licensure Examination (NCLEX).

(h) (1) Data reported
 to the chancellor under this article shall be disaggregated by age, gender, ethnicity, and language spoken at home.

(2) The chancellor’s office shall compile and provide this information to the Legislature and the Governor
 as described in paragraph (3).

(3) Beginning in the 2026–27 fiscal year, the chancellor’s office shall submit the report described in paragraph (2) triennially, on or before December 31, and may submit this report with the report required by subdivision (a) of Section
 88826.5.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that, pursuant to funding to be provided in the annual Budget Act, in the 2009–10 academic year, the California Community Colleges should increase the statewide enrollment of full-time equivalent registered nursing students by 450 and, beginning in the 2010–11 academic year and continuing each academic year thereafter, add 900 new full-time equivalent registered nursing students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 17.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

78261.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) Any community college district, irrespective of whether it participates in the program established by this article, may use any diagnostic assessment tool that is commonly used in registered nursing programs and is approved by the chancellor.

(b) If, after using an approved diagnostic assessment tool, a community college registered nursing program determines that the number of applicants to that program exceeds its capacity, the program is authorized to use additional multicriteria screening measures. This subdivision does not prohibit or prevent a community college registered nursing program from using an approved diagnostic assessment tool before or during a multicriteria screening process.

(c) A community college district may not do either of the following:

(1) Exclude an applicant to a registered nursing program on the basis that the applicant is not a resident of that district or has not completed prerequisite courses in that district.

(2) Implement policies, procedures, and systems, including, but not limited to, priority registration systems, that have the effect of excluding an applicant or student who is not a resident of that district from a registered nursing program of that district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 175, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

78261.5.

(a) A community college registered nursing program that determines that the number of applicants to that program exceeds its capacity may admit students in accordance with any of the following procedures:

(1) Administration of a multicriteria screening process, as authorized by Section 78261.3, in a manner that is consistent with the standards set forth in subdivision (b).

(2) A random selection process.

(3) A blended combination of random selection and a multicriteria screening process.

(b) A community college registered nursing program that elects, on or after
 January 1, 2008, to use a multicriteria screening process to evaluate applicants pursuant to this article shall apply those measures in accordance with all of the following:

(1) The criteria applied in a multicriteria screening process under this article shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Academic degrees or diplomas, or relevant certificates, held by an applicant.

(B) Grade-point average in relevant coursework.

(C) Any relevant work or volunteer experience.

(D) Life experiences or special circumstances of an applicant, including, but not limited to, the following experiences or circumstances:

(i) Disabilities.

(ii) Low family income.

(iii) First generation of family to attend college.

(iv) Need to work.

(v) Disadvantaged social or educational environment.

(vi) Difficult personal and family situations or circumstances.

(vii) Refugee or veteran status.

(viii) Living in a medically underserved area or population, as designated by the federal Health Resources and Services Administration.

(E) Proficiency or advanced level coursework in languages other than English. Credit for
 languages other than English shall be received for languages that are identified by the chancellor as high-frequency languages, as based on census data. These languages may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(i) American Sign Language.

(ii) Arabic.

(iii) Chinese, including its various dialects.

(iv) Farsi.

(v) Russian.

(vi) Spanish.

(vii) Tagalog.

(viii) The various languages of the Indian subcontinent and Southeast Asia.

(ix) The various languages of the African continent.

(2) Additional criteria, such as a personal interview, a personal statement, letter of recommendation, or the number of repetitions of prerequisite classes, or other criteria, as approved by the chancellor, may be used, but are not required.

(3) A community college registered nursing program using a multicriteria screening process under this article may use an approved diagnostic assessment tool, in accordance with Section 78261.3, before, during, or after the multicriteria screening process.

(4) As used in this section:

(A) “Disabilities” has the same meaning as used in Section 2626 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(B) “Disadvantaged social or educational environment” includes, but is not limited to, the status of a student who has participated in Extended Opportunity Programs and Services (EOPS).

(C) “Grade-point average” refers to the same fixed set of required prerequisite courses that all applicants to the nursing program administering the multicriteria screening process are required to complete.

(D) “Low family income” shall be measured by a community college registered nursing program in terms of a student’s eligibility for, or receipt of, financial aid under a program that may include, but is not limited to, a fee waiver from the board of governors under Section 76300, the Cal Grant Program under Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5, the federal Pell Grant program, or CalWORKs.

(E) “Need to work” means that the student is working at least part time while completing academic work that is a prerequisite for admission to the nursing program.

(5) A community college registered nursing program that uses a multicriteria screening process pursuant to this article shall report its nursing program admissions policies to the chancellor annually, in writing. The admissions policies reported under this paragraph shall include the weight given to any criteria used by the program, and shall include demographic information relating to the persons admitted to the program and the persons of that group who successfully completed that program.

(c) The chancellor is encouraged to develop, and make available to community college registered nursing programs by July 1, 2008, a model admissions process based on this section.

(d) (1) The chancellor shall submit a report on or before December 31, 2026, and on or before
 December 31 triennially thereafter, to the Legislature and the Governor that examines and includes, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(A) The participation, retention, and completion rates in community college registered nursing programs of students admitted through a multicriteria screening process, as described in this section, disaggregated by the age, gender, ethnicity, and, if available, the language spoken at the home of those students.

(B) Information on the annual impact, if any, the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012 had
 on the matriculation services for students admitted through the multicriteria screening process, as described in this section.

(2) The chancellor shall submit the triennial report required in paragraph (1) in conjunction with its
 triennial report on associate degree nursing programs required by subdivision (h) of Section 78261.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 18.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.53. Nursing Resource Centers [78262. - 78262.]

78262.

(a) The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall fund the development of regional nursing resource centers that bring together school, hospital, and faculty needs and availability in a regionalized, online format to help schools match their student clinical needs to available openings, assist hospitals to manage their clinical rotation schedules, and facilitate the filling of vacant nursing faculty positions.

(b) The chancellor’s office shall fund regional nursing resource center startup grants to develop clinical placement and clinical faculty resource systems. Each startup grant shall last for no more than 30 months. An applicant for a grant under this article shall do all of the following:

(1) Select an entity for managing the grant.

(2) Ensure the participation of at least 75 percent of the nursing programs and hospitals in the coverage area.

(3) Provide matching funds on a 1:1 basis.

(4) Demonstrate the sustainability of the system after the grant terminates.

(c) The chancellor’s office shall be responsible for developing a request for funding application from hospital and school regional partnerships seeking grant funds and providing technical assistance to communities for the purpose of developing proposals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 837, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.54. Allied Health Programs [78263. - 78263.3.]

78263.

As used in this article, “allied health program” means a community college program that offers certificates or degrees related to allied health professionals, as defined in Section 295p of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   (AB 1891)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Sec. 78263.3.)
-------------------------------------------

78263.1.
